Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.140

Residence of certain individuals—Last known place of residence.

(1) After April 1st of each year ending in zero, and by July 1st of each year ending in zero, the department of corrections shall furnish to the redistricting commission the following information regarding the last known place of residence of each inmate incarcerated in a state adult correctional facility:

(a) A unique identifier, other than the inmate's department of corrections number; and

(b) Last known place of residence information sufficiently specific to determine the congressional and state legislative districts in which the inmate's last known place of residence is located.

(2) After April 1st of each year ending in zero, and by July 1st of each year ending in zero, the department of social and health services shall furnish to the redistricting commission the following information regarding the last known place of residence of each person committed to receive involuntary behavioral health treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW:

(a) A unique identifier, other than the person's patient identification number; and

(b) Last known place of residence information sufficiently specific to determine the congressional and state legislative districts in which the resident's last known place of residence is located.

(3) After April 1st of each year ending in zero, and by July 1st of each year ending in zero, the department of children, youth, and families shall furnish to the redistricting commission the following information regarding the last known place of residence of each person residing or placed in a juvenile justice facility:

(a) A unique identifier, other than the person's patient identification number; and

(b) Last known place of residence information sufficiently specific to determine the congressional and state legislative districts in which the resident's last known place of residence is located.

(4) The redistricting commission shall:

(a) Deem each inmate incarcerated in a state adult correctional facility and person residing or placed in a juvenile justice facility or committed to receive involuntary behavioral health treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW as residing at his or her last known place of residence, rather than at the institution of his or her incarceration, residence, or placement;

(b) Regardless of the form in which the information is furnished, refrain from publishing any information regarding a specific inmate's or resident's last known place of residence;

(c) Deem an inmate or resident in state custody in Washington whose last known place of residence is outside of Washington or whose last known place of residence cannot be determined to reside at the location of the facility in which the inmate or resident is incarcerated, placed, or committed; and

(d) Adjust race and ethnicity data in districts, wards, and precincts in a manner that reflects the inclusion of inmates and residents in the population count of the district, ward, or precinct of their last known place of residence.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Inmate incarcerated in a state adult correctional facility" includes an inmate who has been transferred to a facility outside of Washington to complete his or her term of incarceration.

(b) "Last known place of residence" means the address at which the inmate or resident was last domiciled prior to his or her placement or current term of incarceration, as reported by the inmate or resident.

(c) "Person residing or placed in a juvenile justice facility" and "person committed to receive involuntary behavioral health treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW" include a person who has been transferred to a facility outside of Washington.

(d) "Resident" means persons residing or placed in a juvenile justice facility or committed to receive involuntary behavioral health treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW.

[ 2019 c 456 s 1.]